Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.100

Cooperation with other governmental agencies.

The director is authorized to cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, and agencies of federal government in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter and to promote consistency of regulation.

[ 1998 c 8 s 11; 1927 c 165 s 10; RRS s 3119. Prior: 1901 c 112 s 3, part; 1895 c 167 s 5, part.]